Missouri, session 2026, HB2873.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.902, to read as follows:
227.902. The portion of State Highway E from CRD 101 continuing east to CRD
2 361 in Johnson County shall be designated the "Captain Vernon Collett Memorial
3 Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate
4 signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by the department of
5 transportation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.